Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.115.135

Behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program account.

(1) Any funds appropriated by the legislature for the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program, or any other public or private funds intended for loan repayments or scholarships under this program, must be placed in the account created by this section.

(2) The behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the program must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program. Only the office, or its designee, may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2024 c 369 s 6; 2019 c 302 s 12.]